Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.01
Alcohol, defined.

Alcohol means the product of distillation
of any fermented liquid, whether rectified or diluted, whatever the origin
thereof, and includes synthetic ethyl alcohol and alcohol processed or sold
in a gaseous form. Alcohol does not include denatured alcohol or wood alcohol.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 9.